Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.230

Payment by special assessment.

When such ordinance under which said improvement shall be ordered, shall provide that such improvement shall be paid for, in whole or in part, by special assessment of property benefited thereby, the damages and costs awarded, or such part thereof as is to be paid by special assessment, shall be levied, assessed and collected in the manner hereinafter provided.

[ 1907 c 153 s 19; RRS s 9233. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 19; 1893 c 84 s 19.]